Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Sec. 28.37.010.
Compact enacted.

The Driver License Compact is enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining in it in the form substantially contained in AS

28.37.110

—

28.37.190

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 60 SLA 1986)

Sec. 28.37.020.
Licensing authority.

In this chapter the term “licensing authority” with reference to this state means the entity in the Department of Administration that administers AS

28.15.011

—

28.15.151

. The department shall furnish to the appropriate authority of another party state the information or documents reasonably necessary to facilitate the administration of AS

28.37.130

—

28.37.150

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 60 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 99 § 64 (1997))

Sec. 28.37.030.
Expenses of administrator.

The compact administrator provided for in AS

28.37.170

is not entitled to additional compensation on account of service as the administrator, but is entitled to expenses incurred in connection with the duties and responsibilities as the administrator, in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with other duties or responsibilities of the office or employment.

History.

(§ 18 ch 60 SLA 1986)

Sec. 28.37.040.
Executive head.

In this chapter, with reference to this state, the term “executive head” means the governor.

History.

(§ 18 ch 60 SLA 1986)